Hawaii, session 2026, HB2598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 206M, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part V to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "SUBPart    .  hawaii made it program. §206M-     Establishment.  The development corporation shall establish a Hawaii made IT program to certify local information technology vendors for use by state and county agencies in procurement. §206M-     Vendor requirements; benefits.  (a)  Subject to this subpart, the development corporation shall establish the following vendor requirements for certification in the Hawaii made IT program: (1)  The vendor's headquarters shall be located in the State; (2)  At least two-thirds of the vendor's employees shall be residents of the State; (3)  The vendor has shown at least five consecutive years of state income tax compliance; (4)  Three references from completed government projects; and (5)  A commitment to contribute one per cent of state contract awards to tax deductible nonprofit digital literacy and equity programs. (b)  The development corporation may explore potential vendor benefits of participation in the Hawaii made IT program, including business and competitive advantages, operational benefits, networking and growth opportunities, and training and support opportunities. §206M-     Fees. The development corporation may assess reasonable fees on vendors to cover program staffing, promote certified vendors, and educate procurement offices on the benefits of hiring certified vendors. §206M-     Reporting.  The development corporation shall submit a report to the legislature within thirty days of the launch of the Hawaii made IT program that includes employee counts and median salary data of certified vendors.  Every three years thereafter, the development corporation shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the respective regular session that includes: (1)  The number and value of contracts awarded to certified vendors; (2)  Updated employee counts of certified vendors; (3)  Comparison of certified vendors employees' salaries to the asset limited, income constrained, employed, or ALICE, household threshold; and (4)  An assessment of the program's impact." SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________